Hawaii statutes.
§342L-16 Nonliability of department
personnel. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no member,
officer, or employee of the department shall be criminally liable or
responsible under this chapter for any acts done by the member, officer, or employee
in the performance of the member’s, officer’s, or employee’s duties; provided
that this section shall not apply to violations of section 342L-7(d). [L 1989,
c 212, pt of §6; am L 1992, c 259, §18]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next